Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-6,197.10
Driving under influence of alcohol
or drugs; public education campaign; Department of Motor Vehicles; duties.

The Department of Motor
Vehicles shall conduct an ongoing public education campaign to inform the
residents of this state about the dangers and consequences of driving under
the influence of alcohol or drugs in this state. Information shall include,
but not be limited to, the criminal and administrative penalties for driving
under the influence, any related laws, rules, instructions, and any explanatory
matter. The department shall use its best efforts to utilize all available
opportunities for making public service announcements on television and radio
broadcasts for the public education campaign and to obtain and utilize federal
funds for highway safety and other grants in conducting the public education
campaign. The information may be included in publications containing information
related to other motor vehicle laws and shall be given wide distribution by
the department.

Laws 2011, LB667, § 38.